Utah statutes.
63G-6-905 (Superseded 05/01/13).   Chief procurement officer to collect information as to supplies, etc.

To the extent possible, the chief procurement officer may collect information concerning the type, cost, quality, and quantity of commonly used supplies, services, or construction being procured or used by state public procurement units and local public procurement units.  The chief procurement officer may make the information available to any public procurement unit upon request.

